Washington statutes.
RCW 18.170.040

Armed private security guard license—Requirements.

(1) An applicant must meet the following minimum requirements to obtain an armed private security guard license:

(a) Be licensed as a private security guard;

(b) Be at least twenty-one years of age;

(c) Have a current firearms certificate issued by the commission; and

(d) Pay the fee established by the director.

(2) An armed private security guard license may take the form of an endorsement to the security guard license if deemed appropriate by the director.

[ 1991 c 334 s 4.]